Georgia statutes. TITLE 31 Health
Article 5 State Commission on the Efficacy of the Certificate of Need Program

31-6-90 through 31-6-95.

Repealed pursuant to Code Section 31-6-95, which provided for the repeal of this article on June 30, 2007.

Editor’s notes.

This article was based on Code 1981, §§

31-6-90

through 31-6-95, enacted by Ga. L. 2005, p. 43, § 1/HB 390.